Utah statutes.
76-5a-1.   Legislative determinations -- Purpose of chapter.

The Legislature of Utah determines that the sexual exploitation of minors is excessively harmful to their physiological, emotional, social, and mental development; that minors cannot intelligently and knowingly consent to sexual exploitation; that regardless of whether it is classified as legally obscene, material that sexually exploits minors is not protected by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution or by the First or Fifteenth sections of Article I of the Utah Constitution and may be prohibited; and that prohibition of and punishment for the distribution, possession, possession with intent to distribute, and production of materials that sexually exploit minors is necessary and justified to eliminate the market for those materials and to reduce the harm to the minor inherent in the perpetuation of the record of his sexually exploitive activities.  It is the purpose of this chapter to prohibit the production, possession, possession with intent to distribute, and distribution of materials which sexually exploit minors, regardless of whether the materials are classified as legally obscene.

